Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1032
Act, how cited.

Sections 86-1032 to 86-1086 shall be known and may be cited as the 911 Service System Act.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB993, § 8;

Laws 2024, LB1031, § 7;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1001;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 14.